Washington statutes.
RCW 7.71.050

Medical staff privileges and membership—Revocation, suspension, reduction.

(1) A medical staff privilege sanction process that results in a revocation, suspension, or reduction of medical staff privileges or membership at a health care facility must meet the requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1)(b).

(2) A professional peer review action taken by a health care facility that imposes a revocation, suspension, or reduction of medical staff privileges or membership must meet the requirements of and is subject to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11112.

(3) In this section, "health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.70.075.

[ 2019 c 62 s 2.]